Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3828.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin IRON RANGE RESOURCES AND REHABILITATION; EXTENDING BONDS AUTHORIZED IN 2024.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 69, section 15, subdivision 1, paragraph (d), funds distributed under Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 69, section 15, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clauses (13) and (26), are available until March 30, 2030. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end